Hawaii statutes.
[§291E-49] Transferring title to, or
ownership interest in, vehicle prohibited; exceptions. (a) A registered
owner shall not sell or transfer title to, or ownership interest in, a motor
vehicle during the time period the motor vehicle's registration has been
ordered revoked and number plates surrendered or during the time the motor
vehicle bears the special series number plates pursuant to section 249‑9.4,
unless the registered owner applies to the administrative director of the
courts, or the administrative director's appointee pursuant to section 291E‑1,
for consent to transfer title to the motor vehicle. If the director is
satisfied that:

(1) The proposed sale is in good faith and for valid
consideration;

(2) The registered owner will be deprived of the
custody and control of the motor vehicle; and

(3) The sale is not for the purpose of circumventing
this part,

the director may consent to the sale or transfer.
If the director consents, the director shall issue a certified copy of the
written consent to the registered owner and forward a copy to the appropriate
county director of finance.

(b) The county director of finance, upon
proper application and the presentation to the director of finance of a
certified copy of the director's written consent to the sale or transfer of a
motor vehicle, shall transfer the certificate of title and ownership to the new
owner pursuant to chapter 286 and shall issue new number plates to the new
registered owner pursuant to chapter 249.

(c) Notwithstanding subsections (a) and (b),
if the title to the motor vehicle is transferred by foreclosure of a chattel
mortgage, cancellation of a conditional sales contract, a sale upon execution,
or decree or order of a court of competent jurisdiction, after the motor
vehicle registration has been revoked under this part, the county director of
finance shall transfer the certificate of title and ownership to the new owner
pursuant to chapter 286 and shall issue new number plates to the new registered
owner pursuant to chapter 249. [L 2001, c 157, pt of §3]

Previous
Vol05_Ch0261-0319
Next